Maryland, session 2026, HB1632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is an Anthony McCarthy Task Force to Study Dialysis Outcomes.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) one additional representative of the Maryland Department of Health,
designated by the Secretary of Health; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one physician licensed in the State who specializes in urology;
(ii) one physician licensed in the State who specializes in nephrology;
and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1632*

HOUSE BILL 1632
(iii) two individuals in the State who have received dialysis
treatment.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) evaluate current dialysis patient outcomes in the State;
(2) study methods, programs, and approaches that would improve dialysis
patient outcomes, including:
(i) increased access to in–home dialysis treatment options;
(ii) the establishment of a training program for individuals receiving
in–home dialysis treatment and the individuals’ caretakers;
(iii) the creation of a mandatory certification for home health aides
who provide support to individuals receiving in–home dialysis treatment;
(iv) the establishment of a grant program to provide monetary
support to dialysis patients, including for home modifications for individuals receiving
in–home dialysis treatments;
(v) the creation of a food–as–medicine grant program for dialysis
patients to have reliable access to affordable, renal–friendly foods;
(vi) public service campaigns to educate individuals about kidney
health; and
(vii) community screening events for kidney–related medical
concerns; and
(3) make legislative recommendations regarding methods to improve
dialysis patient outcomes while minimizing taxpayer burdens.

HOUSE BILL 1632 3
(g) On or before May 31, 2027, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.